Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.050

Hearing—Finding of necessity—Setting for trial.

At the time and place appointed for the hearing of such petition, or to which the same may have been adjourned, if the court shall find that all parties interested in such real estate sought to be taken have been duly served with notice and a copy of the petition as above prescribed, and shall further find that such real estate sought to be taken is required and necessary for the purposes of a schoolhouse site, or as an addition to a schoolhouse site, for such school district, the court shall make an order reciting such findings, and shall thereupon set the hearing of such petition down for trial by a jury, as other civil actions are tried, unless a jury is waived in the manner provided by law in other civil actions.

[ 1909 p 373 s 5; RRS s 910. Prior: 1903 c 111 s 5.]